Utah statutes.
53-10-104.   Division duties.
The division shall:
(1)  provide and coordinate the delivery of support services to law
enforcement agencies;
(2)  maintain and provide access to criminal records for use by law
enforcement agencies;
(3)  publish law enforcement and statistical data;
(4)  maintain dispatch and communications services for public safety
communications centers and provide emergency medical, fire suppression,
highway maintenance, public works, and law enforcement communications for
municipal, county, state, and federal agencies;
(5)  analyze evidence from crime scenes and crime-related incidents for
criminal prosecution;
(6)  provide criminalistic laboratory services to federal, state, and local
law enforcement agencies, prosecuting attorneys' and agencies, and public
defenders, with the exception of those services provided by the state medical
examiner in accordance with Title 26, Chapter 4, Utah Medical Examiner Act;
(7)  establish satellite laboratories as necessary to provide criminalistic
services;
(8)  safeguard the public through licensing and regulation of activities that
impact public safety, including concealed weapons, emergency vehicles, and
private investigators;
(9)  provide investigative assistance to law enforcement and other government
agencies;
(10)  collect and provide intelligence information to criminal justice
agencies;
(11)  investigate crimes that jeopardize the safety of the citizens, as well
as the interests, of the state;
(12)  regulate and investigate laws pertaining to the sale and distribution of
liquor;
(13)  make rules to implement this chapter;
(14)  perform the functions specified in this chapter;
(15)  comply with the requirements of Section 11-40-103; and
(16)  comply with the requirements of Sections 72-10-602 and 72-10-603.
